Colorado, session 2026A, HB1013.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 6-1-737, amend (4)(a);
and add (4.5) as follows:
6-1-737. Requirement to disclose certain pricing information -
landlords and tenants - remedies - rules - definitions.
(4) A landlord or the landlord's agent shall not require a tenant to
pay a fee, charge, or amount:
(a) Related to the provision of utilities that is above the amount
charged by the utility provider for service to the tenant's dwelling unit,
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

except FOR FEES, CHARGES, OR AMOUNTS RELATED TO THE PROVISION OF
UTILITIES THAT ARE CHARGED TO A TENANT in accordance with:
(I) Section 38-12-801 (3)(a)(VI); OR
(II) SUBSECTION (4.5) OF THIS SECTION.
(4.5) (a) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (4.5)(b) OF THIS
SECTION, THIS SECTION DOES NOT PROHIBIT A LANDLORD OR LANDLORD'S
AGENT FROM ALLOCATING UTILITY COSTS AMONG TENANTS OF THE SAME
RESIDENTIAL PREMISES USING A RATIO UTILITY BILLING SYSTEM IF:
(I) THE AGGREGATE AMOUNT BILLED TO ALL TENANTS OF THE
RESIDENTIAL PREMISES DOES NOT EXCEED THE TOTAL AMOUNT CHARGED BY
THE UTILITY PROVIDER FOR SERVICE TO THE ENTIRE RESIDENTIAL PREMISES;
(II) THE LANDLORD OR LANDLORD'S AGENT DOES NOT APPLY ANY
MARKUP, SURCHARGE, ADMINISTRATIVE FEE, OR OTHER AMOUNT IN EXCESS
OF THE ACTUAL CHARGES FROM THE UTILITY, EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE
PERMITTED BY LAW;
(III) THE UTILITY COSTS FOR COMMON AREAS OR SHARED FACILITIES
AT THE RESIDENTIAL PREMISES ARE EXCLUDED FROM ANY TENANT
ALLOCATION; AND
(IV) THE LANDLORD CLEARLY AND CONSPICUOUSLY DISCLOSES THE
METHOD OF ALLOCATION FOR THE DWELLING UNIT IN A TENANT'S RENTAL
AGREEMENT OR AN ADDENDUM TO THE TENANT'S RENTAL AGREEMENT.
(b) FOR RESIDENTIAL PREMISES CONSTRUCTED WITH PERMITS
APPLIED FOR ON OR AFTER JULY 1, 2027, GAS, ELECTRIC, AND WATER UTILITY
SERVICE DELIVERED TO A RESIDENTIAL PREMISES MUST BE METERED EITHER
DIRECTLY BY THE UTILITY PROVIDER OR BY A SUBMETER.
SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1013

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1013